Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1323YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 8 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.16B Broad-spectrum cannabidiol 1 products. 2 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 3 otherwise requires: 4 a. âBroad-spectrum cannabidiolâ means any pharmaceutical 5 grade cannabinoid found in the plant Cannabis sativa L. or 6 Cannabis indica or any other preparation thereof that contains 7 no tetrahydrocannabinol. âBroad-spectrum cannabidiolâ does not 8 include âmedical cannabidiolâ as defined in section 124E.2. 9 b. âBroad-spectrum cannabidiol productâ means a product 10 that contains broad-spectrum cannabidiol and contains no 11 tetrahydrocannabinol. 12 c. âLicensed health care professionalâ means the same as 13 provided in section 280.16, subsection 1. 14 d. âSchool nurseâ means the same as provided in section 15 280.16A, subsection 1. 16 2. The board of directors of each school district and the 17 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school 18 shall establish procedures for a school nurse to provide 19 a broad-spectrum cannabidiol product to a student. The 20 procedures must provide that a school nurse shall only provide 21 a broad-spectrum cannabidiol product to a student if the 22 product was provided to the school district or accredited 23 nonpublic school by the parent or guardian of the student 24 and if the product is provided in accordance with written 25 instructions provided by the parent or guardian. The 26 procedures shall provide for the broad-spectrum cannabidiol 27 product to be stored in a secure location when not in use. 28 3. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 2 29 must provide for a form for a parent or guardian that shall 30 be filled out to the satisfaction of the school district 31 or accredited nonpublic school and signed before the 32 broad-spectrum cannabidiol product is provided to the student. 33 The form must include all of the following: 34 a. Instructions to the school district or accredited 35 -1- LSB 1323YH (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 8 nonpublic school on the use of the broad-spectrum cannabidiol 1 product, including the specific circumstances under which the 2 product is to be provided and, if applicable, the time and 3 frequency for providing the product and the expiration date of 4 the product. 5 b. Authorization for the school district or accredited 6 nonpublic school to provide the broad-spectrum cannabidiol 7 product to the student in accordance with the instructions. 8 c. Certification that the product provided by the parent or 9 guardian is a broad-spectrum cannabidiol product. 10 d. Contact information for the parent or guardian and for a 11 licensed health care professional who provides medical care for 12 the student. 13 4. The parent or guardian shall include with the form 14 written documentation that the product provided by the parent 15 or guardian is a broad-spectrum cannabidiol product, which 16 shall include documentation from the manufacturer of the 17 product specifically indicating that the product contains no 18 tetrahydrocannabinol. 19